District of Columbia statutes.
11-2101

Continuation of office.

The Office of the Register of Wills shall continue as an office in the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 516, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-2101.
1973 Ed., § 11-2101.